Hawaii statutes.
§338-8 Compulsory registration of deaths
and fetal deaths. A certificate of every death or fetal death shall be
filed with the department of health in Honolulu or with the local agent of the
department of health in the district in which the death or fetal death occurred
or a dead body was found within three days after the death or fetal death
occurred or the dead body was found. In every instance, a certificate shall be
filed prior to interment or other disposition of the body. [L 1949, c 327, §12;
am L 1951, c 92, §2; RL 1955, §57-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §338-8; am
L 1981, c 113, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next